tests/ky-uu.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../kir.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../kir.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[twol] infinitives":
    кой<v><tv><ger><nom> : коюу
    кал<v><iv><ger><nom> : калуу
    кел<v><iv><ger><nom> : келүү

  "[twol] infinitives with low vowels":
    аарчы<v><tv><ger><nom> : аарчуу
    ээри<v><iv><ger><nom> : ээрүү

  "[twol] infinitives with high vowels":
    алда<v><tv><ger><nom> : алдоо
    эсте<v><tv><ger><nom> : эстөө

  "[twol] +луу forms":
    кой<n>+луу<post> : койлуу
    эчки<n>+луу<post> : эчкилүү

  "[twol] number forms":
    бир<num><coll><advl> : бирөө
    бир<num><coll><acc> : бирөөнү
    эки<num><coll><advl> : экөө
    эки<num><coll><acc> : экөөнү
    үч<num><coll><advl> : үчөө
    үч<num><coll><acc> : үчөөнү
    төрт<num><coll><advl> : төртөө
    төрт<num><coll><acc> : төртөөнү
    беш<num><coll><advl> : бешөө
    беш<num><coll><acc> : бешөөнү
    алты<num><coll><advl> : алтоо
    алты<num><coll><acc> : алтоону
    жети<num><coll><advl> : жетөө
    жети<num><coll><acc> : жетөөнү

  "[twol] numeral forms":
    1<num><coll><advl> : 1-өө
    1<num><coll><acc> : 1-өөнү
    2<num><coll><advl> : 2-өө
    2<num><coll><acc> : 2-өөнү
    3<num><coll><advl> : 3-өө
    3<num><coll><acc> : 3-өөнү
    4<num><coll><advl> : 4-өө
    4<num><coll><acc> : 4-өөнү
    5<num><coll><advl> : 5-өө
    5<num><coll><acc> : 5-өөнү
    6<num><coll><advl> : 6-оо
    6<num><coll><acc> : 6-оону
    7<num><coll><advl> : 7-өө
    7<num><coll><acc> : 7-өөнү
